Louisiana, session 2026, HB946.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. RS. 40:1173.1(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1173.1. Findings; legislative intent
* * *
B. It is the intent of the legislature to improve transparency in prices and care
quality measures by providing for the creation and maintenance of a useful and
comprehensive health service information database comprised of information
published by hospitals in compliance with requirements in 45 CFR Part 180 as
detailed by R.S. 40:1173.7, sorted by provider and service. that can This database
shall be publicly accessed in a manner that ensures protection of individuals'
confidential health information and respects providers of care.
* * *
§1173.2. Definitions
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1326 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 946
(5) "Hospital pricing transparency requirements" means regulations found in
45 CFR Part 180.
Section 3. R.S. 40:1173.7 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1173.7 Compliance with federal pricing transparency regulations
A. Definitions
(1) "Collection" means any of the following:
(a) Attempting to collect a debt from a patient or patient guarantor by
referring the debt directly or indirectly to a debt collector, a collection agency, or
other third party retained by or on behalf of the hospital.
(b) Suing the patient or patient guarantor or enforcing an arbitration or
mediation clause in any hospital documents, including contracts, agreements,
statements, or bills.
(c) Reporting to a consumer reporting agency.
(2) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Health.
B. The department is tasked with annually verifying compliance of all
healthcare providers with hospital pricing transparency requirements.
C. On or before January 1, 2027, and each January first thereafter the
department shall report on its public website in a clear and conspicuous manner the
names of all hospitals that have been found to not be in material compliance with
hospital pricing transparency requirements.
D. For services yielded on or after January 1, 2027:
(1) A healthcare provider that is not in material compliance with hospital
price transparency laws on the date that items or services are purchased from or
provided to a patient shall not initiate or pursue a collection action against the patient
or patient guarantor for a debt owed for the items or services.
(2) If a patient believes that a hospital was not in material compliance with
hospital price transparency laws at the time that items or services were purchased by
or provided to the patient and the hospital takes a collection action against the patient
or patient guarantor the patient or patient guarantor may file suit to determine if:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1326 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 946
(a) The hospital was materially out of compliance with hospital pricing
transparency laws at the time that items or services were provided to that patient.
(b) The noncompliance is related to the items or services provided to the
patient.
(3) The hospital shall not take a collection action against a patient or patient
guarantor while a lawsuit described in this section is pending.
(4) If a judge or jury finds the hospital to be materially out of compliance
with hospital pricing transparency requirements the hospital shall do any of the
following:
(a) Refund the payer any amount of the debt the payer has paid and shall pay
a penalty to the patient or patient guarantor in an amount equal to the total amount
of the debt.
(b) Dismiss or cause to be dismissed any court action with prejudice and pay
any attorney fees and costs incurred by the patient or patient guarantor relating to the
action.
(c) Remove or cause to be removed from the patient's or patient guarantor's
credit report any report made to a consumer reporting agency relating to the debt.
(d) Notify the department of the material noncompliance with hospital pricing
transparency requirements.
E. Nothing in this Section is to be construed to:
(1) Prevent a hospital from billing a patient, patient guarantor, or third-party
payer, including a health insurer, for items or services provided to the patient.
(2) Require a hospital to refund any payment made to the hospital for items
or services provided to the patient, so long as no collection action is taken in
violation of this Section.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1326 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 946